Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 11. General Provisions Applicable to Title.

Sec. 39.35.995.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 143 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

39.35.690

; renumbered in 2005 in accordance with § 144(f), ch. 9, FSSLA 2005.